test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-anikwacas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - anikwacâs - ok : # -m animate noun, squirrel
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg: anikwacâs
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl: anikwacâsak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Loc: anikwacâsihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Obv: anikwacâsa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: anikwacâsis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: anikwacâsisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: anikwacâsisihk

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsiminân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsiminaw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsimiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsiminânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsiminawak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsimiwâwak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsisim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsisim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsisima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otanikwacâsisimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsisiminân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsisiminaw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsisimiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsisimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otanikwacâsisimiyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsisimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsisimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsisima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otanikwacâsisimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsisiminânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsisiminawak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsisimiwâwak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsisimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otanikwacâsisimiyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitanikwacâsimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitanikwacâsimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otanikwacâsimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otanikwacâsimiyihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitanikwacâsiminânihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsiminâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsimiwâwihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otanikwacâsimiwâwihk 
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otanikwacâsimiyihk

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitanikwacâsisimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitanikwacâsisimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otanikwacâsisimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otanikwacâsisimiyihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitanikwacâsisiminânihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsisiminâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsisimiwâwihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otanikwacâsisimiwâwihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otanikwacâsisimiyihk
